Utah statutes.
7-1-402.   Time for payment of fees -- Schedule of additional fees -- Revocation of permit or license for failure to pay fees.

(1)  All financial institutions or other persons under the jurisdiction of the department shall pay to the commissioner for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987, and annually thereafter, the fees, charges, and assessments for the costs of supervision, examination, and administration of the department and for processing all applications and notices as required under this title.

(2)  All per diem and other examination fees shall be paid promptly upon order of the commissioner after completion of an examination.  All other fees, unless otherwise provided, shall be assessed on July 1 and shall be payable to the commissioner on or before July  15.

(3)  Any financial institution or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the department as of July 1 of each year shall pay the total fee for the fiscal year of July 1 through June 30.

(4)  The commissioner may adopt a schedule of fees in addition to those provided in this section that may be assessed for services rendered by the department.  These fees shall be reasonable and fair and shall reflect the cost of the services provided.

(5)  The fees and assessments established in this section shall be in addition to any other fee or tax imposed by law.

(6)  The commissioner may revoke the license or permit of any institution under the jurisdiction of the department for failure to pay the fees, charges, or assessments as provided in this title.

